New Jersey, session 221, A2616.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Community Affairs, not later than the first day of the seventh month next following the enactment of P.L.     , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall compile and post on the web page of the Department of Community Affairs a list of all ongoing mandates required by the State and by the federal government on municipalities and counties for which funding to pay the entire cost thereof has not been provided by the State or by the federal government, as appropriate.  The list shall also contain a good faith estimate of the cost to counties or municipalities, as appropriate, of compliance with the mandate. b.    The commissioner shall annually update and post on the departments web page not later than July 1 of each calendar year the list required pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.